North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 3. Screening of Abuse and Neglect Complaints.

§ 7B-300.
Protective services.

The director of the department of social services in each county of the State shall establish protective services for juveniles alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent.

Protective services shall include the screening of reports, the performance of an assessment using either a family assessment response or an investigative assessment response, casework, or other counseling services to parents, guardians, or other caretakers as provided by the director to help the parents, guardians, or other caretakers and the court to prevent abuse or neglect, to improve the quality of child care, to be more adequate parents, guardians, or caretakers, and to preserve and stabilize family life.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 359, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 923, s. 1; 1997-506, s. 31; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-55, s. 2; 2015-123, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to collaboration between Division of Social Services and Commission of Indian Affairs on Indian child welfare issues, see G.S. 143B-139.5A.

As to establishment of School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative, see note under G.S. 143B-366.

School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 6.24, provides for the development and implementation of a School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. See note at

G.S. 115C-105.20

.

Implementation of Statewide CPS Hotline.

Session Laws 2021-132, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9I.13(c), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and implement a statewide child protective services (CPS) hotline. The Department shall establish a planning and evaluation team consisting of three child welfare staff representing at least three county departments of social services that will provide input on the hotline to include, at a minimum, all of the following:

“(1) A fiscal analysis on the creation and implementation of a statewide CPS hotline.

“(2) Quantify the total up-front, one-time costs to implement the statewide CPS hotline, including any State or county savings that would be incurred through the full implementation of and transition to a statewide CPS hotline.

“(3) Recommendations on the operational needs for the statewide CPS hotline, including adequate staffing levels to ensure a responsive and timely system.

“(4) Evaluation of whether a county may opt out of the statewide CPS hotline.

“(5) Recommendations of defined measures, goals, and service level agreements to evaluate the performance of the hotline.

“(6) A time line for implementation of the statewide CPS hotline that is aligned and coordinated with the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, and local county departments of social services, including the implementation of intake and assessment technology as a precondition to the operation of a statewide CPS hotline.

“(7) An assessment of the feasibility of an integrated statewide CPS hotline for both child protective services and adult protective services.

“(b) The Department shall submit a progress report on its development and implementation of the statewide CPS hotline required by this section to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services no later than September 1, 2022.”

§ 7B-301.
Duty to report abuse, neglect, dependency, or death due to maltreatment.

Any person or institution who has cause to suspect that any juvenile is abused, neglected, or dependent, as defined by

G.S. 7B-101

, or has died as the result of maltreatment, shall report the case of that juvenile to the director of the department of social services in the county where the juvenile resides or is found. The report may be made orally, by telephone, or in writing. The report shall include information as is known to the person making it including the name and address of the juvenile; the name and address of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or caretaker; the age of the juvenile; the names and ages of other juveniles in the home; the present whereabouts of the juvenile if not at the home address; the nature and extent of any injury or condition resulting from abuse, neglect, or dependency; and any other information which the person making the report believes might be helpful in establishing the need for protective services or court intervention. If the report is made orally or by telephone, the person making the report shall give the person’s name, address, and telephone number. Refusal of the person making the report to give a name shall not preclude the department’s assessment of the alleged abuse, neglect, dependency, or death as a result of maltreatment.

Any person or institution who knowingly or wantonly fails to report the case of a juvenile as required by subsection (a) of this section, or who knowingly or wantonly prevents another person from making a report as required by subsection (a) of this section, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-123, s. 3, effective January 1, 2016.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 923, s. 2; 1993, c. 516, s. 4; 1997-506, s. 32; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-55, s. 3; 2013-52, s. 7; 2015-123, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to failure to report the disappearance of a child to law enforcement generally, see

G.S. 14-318.5

.

§ 7B-302.
Assessment by director; military affiliation; access to confidential information; notification of person making the report.

When a report of abuse, neglect, or dependency is received, the director of the department of social services shall make a prompt and thorough assessment, using either a family assessment response or an investigative assessment response, in order to ascertain the facts of the case, including collecting information concerning the military affiliation of the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker of the juvenile alleged to have been abused or neglected, the extent of the abuse or neglect, and the risk of harm to the juvenile, in order to determine whether protective services should be provided or the complaint filed as a petition. When the report alleges abuse, the director shall immediately, but no later than 24 hours after receipt of the report, initiate the assessment. When the report alleges neglect or dependency, the director shall initiate the assessment within 72 hours following receipt of the report. When the report alleges abandonment of a juvenile or unlawful transfer of custody under

G.S. 14-321.2

, the director shall immediately initiate an assessment. When the report alleges abandonment, the director shall also take appropriate steps to assume temporary custody of the juvenile, and take appropriate steps to secure an order for nonsecure custody of the juvenile. The assessment and evaluation shall include a visit to the place where the juvenile resides, except when the report alleges abuse or neglect in a child care facility as defined in Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes. When a report alleges abuse or neglect in a child care facility as defined in Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes, a visit to the place where the juvenile resides is not required. When the report alleges abandonment, the assessment shall include a request from the director to law enforcement officials to investigate through the North Carolina Center for Missing Persons and other national and State resources whether the juvenile is a missing child.

(a1)

All information received by the department of social services, including the identity of the reporter, shall be held in strictest confidence by the department, except under the following circumstances:

The department shall disclose confidential information to any federal, State, or local government entity or its agent, or any private child placing or adoption agency licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services, in order to protect a juvenile from abuse or neglect. The disclosure of confidential information pursuant to this subdivision shall include sharing information with the appropriate military authority if the director finds evidence that a juvenile may have been abused or neglected and the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker of the juvenile alleged to have been abused or neglected has a military affiliation. Any confidential information disclosed to any federal, State, or local government entity or its agent under this subsection shall remain confidential with the other entity or its agent and shall only be redisclosed for purposes directly connected with carrying out that entity’s mandated responsibilities.

(1a)

The department shall disclose confidential information regarding the identity of the reporter to any federal, State, or local government entity or its agent with a court order. The department may only disclose confidential information regarding the identity of the reporter to a federal, State, or local government entity or its agent without a court order when the entity demonstrates a need for the reporter’s name to carry out the entity’s mandated responsibilities.

The juvenile’s guardian ad litem or the juvenile, including a juvenile who has reached age 18 or been emancipated is authorized to review the record and request all or part of the record unless prohibited by federal law. The department shall provide electronic or written copies of the requested information within a reasonable period of time.

A district or superior court judge of this State presiding over a civil matter in which the department of social services is not a party may order the department to release confidential information, after providing the department with reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard and then determining that the information is relevant and necessary to the trial of the matter before the court and unavailable from any other source. This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve any court of its duty to conduct hearings and make findings required under relevant federal law, before ordering the release of any private medical or mental health information or records related to substance abuse or HIV status or treatment. The department of social services may surrender the requested records to the court, for in camera review, if the surrender is necessary to make the required determinations.

A district or superior court judge of this State presiding over a criminal or delinquency matter shall conduct an in camera review prior to releasing to the defendant or juvenile any confidential records maintained by the department of social services, except those records the defendant or juvenile is entitled to pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection.

The department may disclose confidential information to a parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker in accordance with

G.S. 7B-700

of this Subchapter.

(a2)

If the director, at any time after receiving a report that a juvenile may be abused, neglected, or dependent, determines that the juvenile’s legal residence is in another county, the director shall promptly notify the director in the county of the juvenile’s residence, and the two directors shall coordinate efforts to ensure that appropriate actions are taken.

(a3)

Except where prohibited by federal law, including state plan requirements within federal programs, and notwithstanding other applicable State law, any of the following may request access to confidential information and records maintained pursuant to this Article by the Department or a county department of social services:

(1)

An individual member of the North Carolina General Assembly.

(2)

A joint legislative oversight committee of the North Carolina General Assembly.A request made pursuant to this subsection shall be made to the Department or to the director of a county department of social services. The request shall be limited to purposes necessary for oversight of programs related to child protective services. Upon receiving a request pursuant to this subsection, the Department shall coordinate with the county department of social services to obtain all necessary information or records responsive to the request. A county department of social services shall provide the Department with all information and records, or copies of records, as requested. If the request is made to the director of a county department of social services, the Department shall assist the director of the county department of social services in fulfilling the request and providing all necessary information or records in accordance with this subsection. Upon receipt of a request from an individual member of the North Carolina General Assembly, the Department shall make the confidential information and records available for inspection and examination at the county department of social services. Upon the request of a joint legislative oversight committee, the Department shall assist the director of the county department of social services with sharing the confidential information and records with the requesting committee in a closed session in accordance with G.S. 143-318.11(a)(1).The confidential information or records shared pursuant to this subsection shall be the minimum necessary to satisfy the request. A member of the North Carolina General Assembly or joint legislative oversight committee shall not retain copies of any part of the information and records or take photographs or create electronic images of any information and records reviewed pursuant to a request under this subsection. All information and records shared pursuant to this subsection shall be withheld from public inspection and maintained in a confidential manner. The following information shall remain confidential and shall not be shared or disclosed in response to a request for information and records made pursuant to this subsection:

(1)

The identity of a reporter.

(2)

Juvenile court records as set forth in Article 29 of Subchapter III of this Chapter and Article 30 of Subchapter III of this Chapter.

(a4)

Any violation of subsection (a3) of this section shall be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor.

(a5)

The disclosure of confidential information pursuant to subsection (a3) of this section may only be requested for information received or created by the agency on or after the effective date of this section.

When a report of a juvenile’s death as a result of suspected maltreatment or a report of suspected abuse, neglect, or dependency of a juvenile in a noninstitutional setting is received, the director of the department of social services shall immediately ascertain if other juveniles live in the home, and, if so, initiate an assessment in order to determine whether they require protective services or whether immediate removal of the juveniles from the home is necessary for their protection. When a report of a juvenile’s death as a result of maltreatment or a report of suspected abuse, neglect, or dependency of a juvenile in an institutional setting such as a residential child care facility or residential educational facility is received, the director of the department of social services shall immediately ascertain if other juveniles remain in the facility subject to the alleged perpetrator’s care or supervision, and, if so, assess the circumstances of those juveniles in order to determine whether they require protective services or whether immediate removal of those juveniles from the facility is necessary for their protection.

If the assessment indicates that abuse, neglect, or dependency has occurred, the director shall decide whether immediate removal of the juvenile or any other juveniles in the home is necessary for their protection. If immediate removal does not seem necessary, the director shall immediately provide or arrange for protective services. If the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker refuses to accept the protective services provided or arranged by the director, the director shall sign a petition seeking to invoke the jurisdiction of the court for the protection of the juvenile or juveniles.

If immediate removal seems necessary for the protection of the juvenile or other juveniles in the home, the director shall sign a petition that alleges the applicable facts to invoke the jurisdiction of the court. Where the assessment shows that it is warranted, a protective services worker may assume temporary custody of the juvenile for the juvenile’s protection pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter.

(d1)

Whenever a juvenile is removed from the home of a parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, or adult relative entrusted with the juvenile’s care due to physical abuse, the director shall conduct a thorough review of the background of the alleged abuser or abusers. This review shall include a criminal history check and a review of any available mental health records. If the review reveals that the alleged abuser or abusers have a history of violent behavior against people, the director shall petition the court to order the alleged abuser or abusers to submit to a complete mental health evaluation by a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist.

In performing any duties related to the assessment of the report or the provision or arrangement for protective services, the director may consult with any public or private agencies or individuals, including the available State or local law enforcement officers who shall assist in the assessment and evaluation of the seriousness of any report of abuse, neglect, or dependency when requested by the director. The director or the director’s representative may make a written demand for any information or reports, whether or not confidential, that may in the director’s opinion be relevant to the assessment or provision of protective services. Upon the director’s or the director’s representative’s request and unless protected by the attorney-client privilege, any public or private agency or individual shall provide access to and copies of this confidential information and these records to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations. If a custodian of criminal investigative information or records believes that release of the information will jeopardize the right of the State to prosecute a defendant or the right of a defendant to receive a fair trial or will undermine an ongoing or future investigation, it may seek an order from a court of competent jurisdiction to prevent disclosure of the information. In such an action, the custodian of the records shall have the burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence that disclosure of the information in question will jeopardize the right of the State to prosecute a defendant or the right of a defendant to receive a fair trial or will undermine an ongoing or future investigation. Actions brought pursuant to this paragraph shall be set down for immediate hearing, and subsequent proceedings in the actions shall be accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts.

Within five working days after receipt of the report of abuse, neglect, or dependency, the director shall give written notice to the person making the report, unless requested by that person not to give notice, as to whether the report was accepted for assessment and whether the report was referred to the appropriate State or local law enforcement agency.

Within five working days after completion of the protective services assessment, the director shall give subsequent written notice to the person making the report, unless requested by that person not to give notice, as to whether there is a finding of abuse, neglect, or dependency, whether the county department of social services is taking action to protect the juvenile, and what action it is taking, including whether or not a petition was filed. The person making the report shall be informed of procedures necessary to request a review by the prosecutor of the director’s decision not to file a petition. A request for review by the prosecutor shall be made within five working days of receipt of the second notification. The second notification shall include notice that, if the person making the report is not satisfied with the director’s decision, the person may request review of the decision by the prosecutor within five working days of receipt. The person making the report may waive the person’s right to this notification, and no notification is required if the person making the report does not identify himself to the director.

The director or the director’s representative may not enter a private residence for assessment purposes without at least one of the following:

The reasonable belief that a juvenile is in imminent danger of death or serious physical injury.

The permission of the parent or person responsible for the juvenile’s care.

The accompaniment of a law enforcement officer who has legal authority to enter the residence.

An order from a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1985, c. 205; 1991, c. 593, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 923, s. 3; 1993, c. 516, s. 5; 1995, c. 411, s. 1; 1997-390, s. 3.1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, ss. 2, 19; 1999-190, s. 2; 1999-318, s. 2; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-291, s. 1; 2003-304, s. 4.1; 2005-55, s. 4; 2006-205, s. 1; 2009-311, s. 1; 2012-153, s. 6; 2015-123, s. 4; 2016-94, s. 12C.1(e); 2016-115, s. 4; 2017-102, s. 2; 2019-201, s. 3(a); 2021-100, s. 2; 2021-132, s. 1(c).

Cross References.

As to support for adoptive families at risk of dissolution, see

G.S. 48-1-110

.

§ 7B-303.
Interference with assessment.

If any person obstructs or interferes with an assessment required by

G.S. 7B-302

, the director may file a petition naming that person as respondent and requesting an order directing the respondent to cease the obstruction or interference. The petition shall contain the name and date of birth and address of the juvenile who is the subject of the assessment; shall include a concise statement of the basis for initiating the assessment, shall specifically describe the conduct alleged to constitute obstruction of or interference with the assessment; and shall be verified.

For purposes of this section, obstruction of or interference with an assessment means refusing to disclose the whereabouts of the juvenile, refusing to allow the director to have personal access to the juvenile, refusing to allow the director to observe or interview the juvenile in private, refusing to allow the director access to confidential information and records upon request pursuant to

G.S. 7B-302

, refusing to allow the director to arrange for an evaluation of the juvenile by a physician or other expert, or other conduct that makes it impossible for the director to carry out the duty to assess the juvenile’s condition.

Upon filing of the petition, the court shall schedule a hearing to be held not less than five days after service of the petition and summons on the respondent. Service of the petition and summons and notice of hearing shall be made as provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure on the respondent; the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker; and any other person determined by the court to be a necessary party. If at the hearing on the petition the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the respondent, without lawful excuse, has obstructed or interfered with an assessment required by

G.S. 7B-302

, the court may order the respondent to cease such obstruction or interference. The burden of proof shall be on the petitioner.

If the director has reason to believe that the juvenile is in need of immediate protection or assistance, the director shall so allege in the petition and may seek an ex parte order from the court. If the court, from the verified petition and any inquiry the court makes of the director, finds probable cause to believe both that the juvenile is at risk of immediate harm and that the respondent is obstructing or interfering with the director’s ability to assess the juvenile’s condition, the court may enter an ex parte order directing the respondent to cease the obstruction or interference. The order shall be limited to provisions necessary to enable the director to conduct an assessment sufficient to determine whether the juvenile is in need of immediate protection or assistance. Within 10 days after the entry of an ex parte order under this subsection, a hearing shall be held to determine whether there is good cause for the continuation of the order or the entry of a different order. An order entered under this subsection shall be served on the respondent along with a copy of the petition, summons, and notice of hearing.

The director may be required at a hearing under this section to reveal the identity of any person who made a report of suspected abuse, neglect, or dependency as required by

G.S. 7B-301

.

An order entered pursuant to this section is enforceable by civil or criminal contempt as provided in Chapter 5A of the General Statutes.

History.

1987, c. 409, s. 1; 1993, c. 516, s. 6; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-55, s. 5.

§ 7B-304.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003, c. 140, s. 1, effective June 4, 2003.

§ 7B-305.
Request for review by prosecutor.

The person making the report shall have five working days, from receipt of the decision of the director of the department of social services not to petition the court, to notify the prosecutor that the person is requesting a review. The prosecutor shall notify the person making the report and the director of the time and place for the review, and the director shall immediately transmit to the prosecutor a copy of a summary of the assessment.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-55, s. 6.

§ 7B-306.
Review by prosecutor.

The prosecutor shall review the director’s determination that a petition should not be filed within 20 days after the person making the report is notified. The review shall include conferences with the person making the report, the protective services worker, the juvenile, if practicable, and other persons known to have pertinent information about the juvenile or the juvenile’s family. At the conclusion of the conferences, the prosecutor may affirm the decision made by the director, may request the appropriate local law enforcement agency to investigate the allegations, or may direct the director to file a petition.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 7; 1993, c. 516, s. 7; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60.

§ 7B-307.
Duty of director to report evidence of abuse, neglect; investigation by local law enforcement; notification to appropriate military authority; notification of Department of Health and Human Services.

If the director finds evidence that a juvenile may have been abused as defined by

G.S. 7B-101

, the director shall make an immediate oral and subsequent written report of the findings to the district attorney or the district attorney’s designee and the appropriate local law enforcement agency, including notifying the appropriate military authority that there is evidence of abuse or neglect of a juvenile by a parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker with that military affiliation, within 48 hours after receipt of the report. The local law enforcement agency shall immediately, but no later than 48 hours after receipt of the information, initiate and coordinate a criminal investigation with the protective services assessment being conducted by the county department of social services. Upon completion of the investigation, the district attorney shall determine whether criminal prosecution is appropriate and may request the director or the director’s designee to appear before a magistrate.If the director receives information that a juvenile may have been physically harmed in violation of any criminal statute by any person other than the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker, the director shall make an immediate oral and subsequent written report of that information to the district attorney or the district attorney’s designee and to the appropriate local law enforcement agency within 48 hours after receipt of the information. The local law enforcement agency shall immediately, but no later than 48 hours after receipt of the information, initiate a criminal investigation. Upon completion of the investigation, the district attorney shall determine whether criminal prosecution is appropriate.If the report received pursuant to

G.S. 7B-301

involves abuse or neglect of a juvenile or child maltreatment, as defined in

G.S. 110-105.3

, in child care, the director shall notify the Department of Health and Human Services within 24 hours or on the next working day of receipt of the report.

The director of the department of social services shall submit a report of alleged abuse, neglect, or dependency cases or child fatalities that are the result of alleged maltreatment to the central registry under the policies adopted by the Social Services Commission.

, (c) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-123, s. 5, effective January 1, 2016.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1983, c. 199; 1985, c. 757, s. 156(s)-(u); 1991, c. 593, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 923, s. 4; 1993, c. 516, s. 8; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-506, s. 33; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-55, s. 7; 2015-123, s. 5; 2019-201, s. 3(b).

§ 7B-308.
Authority of medical professionals in abuse cases.

Any physician or administrator of a hospital, clinic, or other medical facility to which a suspected abused juvenile is brought for medical diagnosis or treatment shall have the right, when authorized by the chief district court judge of the district or the judge’s designee, to retain physical custody of the juvenile in the facility when the physician who examines the juvenile certifies in writing that the juvenile who is suspected of being abused should remain for medical treatment or that, according to the juvenile’s medical evaluation, it is unsafe for the juvenile to return to the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker. This written certification must be signed by the certifying physician and must include the time and date that the judicial authority to retain custody is given. Copies of the written certification must be appended to the juvenile’s medical and judicial records and another copy must be given to the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker. The right to retain custody in the facility shall exist for up to 12 hours from the time and date contained in the written certification.

Immediately upon receipt of judicial authority to retain custody, the physician, the administrator, or that person’s designee shall so notify the director of social services for the county in which the facility is located. The director shall treat this notification as a report of suspected abuse and shall immediately begin an assessment of the case.

If the assessment reveals (i) that it is the opinion of the certifying physician that the juvenile is in need of medical treatment to cure or alleviate physical distress or to prevent the juvenile from suffering serious physical injury, and (ii) that it is the opinion of the physician that the juvenile should for these reasons remain in the custody of the facility for 12 hours, but (iii) that the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker cannot be reached or, upon request, will not consent to the treatment within the facility, the director shall within the initial 12-hour period file a juvenile petition alleging abuse and setting forth supporting allegations and shall seek a nonsecure custody order. A petition filed and a nonsecure custody order obtained in accordance with this subdivision shall come on for hearing under the regular provisions of this Subchapter unless the director and the certifying physician together voluntarily dismiss the petition.

In all cases except those described in subdivision (1) above, the director shall conduct the assessment and may initiate juvenile proceedings and take all other steps authorized by the regular provisions of this Subchapter. If the director decides not to file a petition, the physician, the administrator, or that person’s designee may ask the prosecutor to review this decision according to the provisions of

G.S. 7B-305

and

G.S. 7B-306

.

If, upon hearing, the court determines that the juvenile is found in a county other than the county of legal residence, in accord with

G.S. 153A-257

, the juvenile may be transferred, in accord with G.S. 7B-903(2), to the custody of the department of social services in the county of residence.

If the court, upon inquiry, determines that the medical treatment rendered was necessary and appropriate, the cost of that treatment may be charged to the parents, guardian, custodian, or caretaker, or, if the parents are unable to pay, to the county of residence in accordance with

G.S. 7B-903

and

G.S. 7B-904

.

Except as otherwise provided, a petition begun under this section shall proceed in like manner with petitions begun under

G.S. 7B-302

.

The procedures in this section are in addition to, and not in derogation of, the abuse and neglect reporting provisions of

G.S. 7B-301

and the temporary custody provisions of

G.S. 7B-500

. Nothing in this section shall preclude a physician or administrator and a director of social services from following the procedures of

G.S. 7B-301

and

G.S. 7B-500

whenever these procedures are more appropriate to the juvenile’s circumstances.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 716, s. 2; 1995, c. 255, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-55, s. 8.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1981 family law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1379 (1982).

For comment, “The Child Abuse Amendments of 1984: Congress Is Calling North Carolina to Respond to the Baby Doe Dilemma,” 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 975 (1984).

For article, “Child Sexual Abuse and Statements for the Purpose of Medical Diagnosis or Treatment,” see 67 N.C.L. Rev. 257 (1989).

§ 7B-309.
Immunity of persons reporting and cooperating in an assessment.

Anyone who makes a report pursuant to this Article; cooperates with the county department of social services in a protective services assessment; testifies in any judicial proceeding resulting from a protective services report or assessment; provides information or assistance, including medical evaluations or consultation in connection with a report, investigation, or legal intervention pursuant to a good-faith report of child abuse or neglect; or otherwise participates in the program authorized by this Article; is immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed for that action provided that the person was acting in good faith. In any proceeding involving liability, good faith is presumed.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, s. 469, s. 8; 1993, c. 516, s. 9; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-55, s. 9; 2019-240, s. 18.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-240, s. 18, effective November 6, 2019, inserted “assessment; provides information or assistance, including medical evaluations or consultation in connection with a report, investigation, or legal intervention pursuant to a good-faith report of child abuse or neglect”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 7B-310.
Privileges not grounds for failing to report or for excluding evidence.

No privilege shall be grounds for any person or institution failing to report that a juvenile may have been abused, neglected, or dependent, even if the knowledge or suspicion is acquired in an official professional capacity, except when the knowledge or suspicion is gained by an attorney from that attorney’s client during representation only in the abuse, neglect, or dependency case. No privilege, except the attorney-client privilege, shall be grounds for excluding evidence of abuse, neglect, or dependency in any judicial proceeding (civil, criminal, or juvenile) in which a juvenile’s abuse, neglect, or dependency is in issue nor in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report submitted under this Article, both as this privilege relates to the competency of the witness and to the exclusion of confidential communications.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987, c. 323, s. 1; 1993, c. 514, s. 3; c. 516, s. 10; 1995, c. 509, s. 133; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on spousal testimony in criminal proceedings, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 990 (1981).

For comment, “The Child Abuse Amendments of 1984: Congress Is Calling North Carolina to Respond to the Baby Doe Dilemma,” 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 975 (1984).

For article, “Child Sexual Abuse and Statements for the Purpose of Medical Diagnosis or Treatment,” see 67 N.C.L. Rev. 257 (1989).